New Mexico, session 2026, SB261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 1-20-24 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 2024, Chapter 50, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read: "1-20-24. UNLAWFUL POSSESSION OF A FIREARM AT A POLLING PLACE.-- A. Unlawful possession of a firearm at a polling place consists of possession of a loaded or unloaded firearm by any person within: (1) one hundred feet of the door through which voters may enter to vote at a school building in which a polling place is located while early voting is in progress or on election day; (2) one hundred feet of the door through which voters may enter to vote at the office of the county clerk, an alternate voting location, a mobile voting site or any location used as a polling place while early voting is in progress or on election day that is not a school; or (3) fifty feet of a monitored secured container as used in Subsection E of Section 1-6-9 NMSA 1978, beginning twenty-eight days before an election through election day. B. The provisions of Subsection A of this section do not apply to: [(1) a certified law enforcement officer in performance of the officer's official duties; (2) a law enforcement officer who is certified pursuant to the Law Enforcement Training Act acting in accordance with the policies of the officer's law enforcement agency; (3) a commissioned law enforcement officer with the power to arrest in performance of the officer's official duties; (4) a commissioned law enforcement officer with the power to arrest acting in accordance with the policies of the officer's law enforcement agency; (5)] (1) a law enforcement officer when the law enforcement officer's presence is requested by the presiding judge, an election judge, a county clerk or the secretary of state to assist in maintaining order and orderly control of access or to respond to a disaster or an emergency event; (2) a person in a private automobile or other private means of conveyance; or [(6) a person carrying a concealed firearm who is in possession of a valid concealed handgun license for that firearm pursuant to the Concealed Handgun Carry Act. C. A person conducting lawful, non-election-related business nearer than one hundred feet from the door through which voters may enter to vote or nearer than fifty feet from a monitored secured container is not guilty of unlawful possession of a firearm at a polling place.] (3) a commissioned law enforcement officer whose office is located in the same facility as the polling place. [D.] C. A person who commits unlawful possession of a firearm at a polling place is guilty of a petty misdemeanor and shall be sentenced pursuant to Section 31-19-1 NMSA 1978, in addition to any other penalty provided by law. [E.] D. For the purposes of this section, "firearm" means a weapon that will or is designed to or may readily be converted to expel a projectile by the action of an explosion, or the frame or receiver of any such weapon." - 4 -